Utah statutes.
7-18a-206.   Change of control of foreign depository institution.
A foreign depository institution authorized by this state to transact business
through an agency, branch, or representative office in this state shall file
with the commissioner a notice, in such form and containing such information
as the commissioner may prescribe, no later than 14 days after the change of
control of the foreign depository institution.
